New Jersey, session 222, A5538.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2026, c.27, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 46 DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH 20 Physical and Mental Health 21 Health Services GRANTS-IN-AID 02-4220  Family Health Services .......................................... $455,000 Total Grant-in-Aid appropriation, Health Services .................................................... $455,000 Grant-in-Aid: 02    NJ Center for Tourette Syndrome and Associated Disorders     ($455,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.